New York, session 2025-2026, A7835.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 3-114 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3-114. Receipt of private funding prohibited. The state board of 4 elections is hereby prohibited from accepting any donation of private 5 funds for use for election administration. For the purposes of this 6 section, the term "private funds" shall mean any amount of money from 7 any individual, corporation or other business entity, nonprofit or not- 8 for-profit organization, or other non-public entity. 9 § 2. The election law is amended by adding a new section 3-228 to read 10 as follows: 11 § 3-228. Receipt of private funding prohibited. All boards of 12 elections in this state are hereby prohibited from accepting any 13 donation of private funds for use for election administration. For the 14 purposes of this section, the term "private funds" shall mean any amount 15 of money from any individual, corporation or other business entity, 16 nonprofit or not-for-profit organization, or other non-public entity. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05174-01-5